Florida, session 2026, HB75.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 112.235, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
112.235 Public works employees; first responder
identification cards.—
(1) As used in this section, the term "public works
employee" means a public employee whose primary duties involve
the construction, maintenance, repair, renovation, remodeling,
or improvement of a building, highway, road, street, sewer,
storm drain, water system, site development, irrigation system,
reclamation project, gas or electrical distribution system, gas
or electrical substation, or other facility, project, or portion
thereof owned in whole or in part by a municipality, county, or
other political subdivision of this state.
(2) A municipality, county, or other political subdivision
of this state shall issue to each public works employee who is
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb75-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 75 2026
not on probation an identification card indicating that he or
she is a first responder.
(3) The issuance of an identification card to a public
works employee under subsection (2) does not affect his or her
salary, pension, or other employment benefits.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb75-00